Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-171
Audit, report, or financial statement;
federal regulation; made by whom.

Whenever any federal regulation
requires any audit, report, financial statement, or other document to be prepared
by a certified public accountant, such requirement shall be construed to mean
a certified public accountant holding a permit issued under subdivision (1)(a)
of section 1-136 or a person
exercising the practice privilege or temporary practice privilege.

Laws 1965, c. 1, § 2, p. 59;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 63;

Laws 2009, LB31, § 40.